Washington statutes.
RCW 43.370.040

Department of health—Certificate of need review program.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5568-S.SL) ***

The office shall submit the strategy to the department of health to direct its activities related to the certificate of need review program under chapter 70.38 RCW. As the health care facilities and services plan is updated for any specific geographic planning region, the office shall submit that plan to the department of health to direct its activities related to the certificate of need review program under chapter 70.38 RCW. The office shall not issue determinations of the merits of specific project proposals submitted by applicants for certificates of need.

[ 2007 c 259 s 53.]